Tennessee, session 114, HB2168.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 10-7-504, is amended by deleting
subsection (h) and substituting:
(h)
(1) Notwithstanding another law to the contrary, the names of persons
directly involved in carrying out a sentence of death are confidential and are
exempt from public disclosure.
(2) The identity of a supplier that compounds, distributes, or
manufactures the drugs obtained and used by the department of correction to
carry out an execution by lethal injection is not confidential, is open to public
inspection, and may be subject to discovery or introduction as evidence in a civil
proceeding. The qualifications, evidence of competency, and relevant
experience of an officer or employee of the supplier, and a person or contractor
used by the supplier to obtain equipment or substances to facilitate the
compounding, distribution, or manufacturing of the drugs used by the department
of correction in carrying out a sentence of death are not confidential and are
open to public inspection. However, the residential and office addresses,
residential and office telephone numbers, social security numbers, and tax
identification numbers of officers and employees of the supplier and any person
or contractor used by the supplier to obtain equipment or substances to facilitate
HB2168
012171
- 1 -

the compounding of such drugs are confidential and are exempt from public
disclosure.
(3) Records related to remuneration to a person or a supplier in
connection with the person's or supplier's participation in or preparation for the
execution of a sentence of death are not confidential and are open to public
inspection. Payments must be made in accordance with a memorandum of
understanding between the commissioner of correction and the commissioner of
finance and administration. If a contractor is employed to participate in or
prepare for the execution of a sentence of death, then the amount of the special
payment made to the contractor pursuant to the contract must be reported by the
commissioner of correction to the comptroller of the treasury and the amount is
not confidential.
(4) Information made confidential by this subsection (h) must be redacted
wherever possible, and nothing in this subsection (h) limits or denies access to
otherwise public information because a file, a document, or data file contains
confidential information.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 012171